Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Chapter 99. General Provisions.

Sec. 43.99.010.
Accounts to be kept by persons subject to tax.

A person subject to a tax shall keep in permanent form at the person’s principal place of business or occupation within the state correct accounts in a manner that will readily disclose, upon examination, the amount of tax due the state.
The department may adopt regulations for the making and keeping of these records.

History.

(§ 35-1-15 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.80.010

. Renumbered in 1983.

Administrative Code. —

For special rules: water transportation carriers, see 15 AAC 19, art. 11.

Sec. 43.99.950.
Definitions.

Except in AS 43.70, in this title,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of revenue; and

“department” means the Department of Revenue.

History.

(am E.O. No. 68, § 6 (1988); am § 9 ch 45 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.80.040

. Renumbered in 1983.